Wyoming, session 2026, HB0177.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 5-1-102(a) is amended to read:

5-1-102. Terms of judicial nominating commission
members; expenses; removal.

(a) The terms of the elected and appointed voting
members of the judicial nominating commission created by
Article 5, Section 4, Wyoming Constitution, shall be four
HB0177

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0499
(4) years except the initial term for one (1) attorney and
one (1) elector shall be two (2) years and the initial term
for one (1) attorney and one (1) elector shall be three (3)
years. The members of the Wyoming state bar initially
elected to the commission shall draw lots to determine the
term each shall serve. The governor shall designate whether
the length of the term of electors he initially appoints to
the commission shall be two (2), three (3) or four (4)
years. Appointments made by the governor of voting members
to the commission shall require senate confirmation in
accordance with W.S. 28-12-101 through 28-12-103. The
governor may remove any member he appoints as provided in
W.S. 9-1-202.

Section 2. This act shall apply to judicial
nominating commission members whose terms commence on or
after July 1, 2026.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0177